Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 3. Provisions of General Applicability

§ 121.
Cancellation of assistance or benefits.

If at any time the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access has reason to believe that assistance or benefits have been improperly obtained, he or she shall cause an investigation to be made and may suspend assistance or benefits pending the investigation. If on investigation the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access is satisfied that the assistance or benefits were illegally obtained, he or she shall immediately cancel them. A person having illegally obtained assistance or benefits shall not be eligible for reinstatement until his or her need has been reestablished.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 72;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.38.

§ 122.
Recovery of payments.

The amount of assistance or benefits may be changed or cancelled at any time if the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access finds that the recipient’s circumstances have changed. Upon granting assistance or benefits the Department for Children and Families or the Department of Vermont Health Access shall inform the recipient that changes in his or her circumstances must be promptly reported to the Department.

When on the death of a person receiving assistance it is found that the recipient possessed income or property in excess of that reported to the Department for Children and Families or the Department of Vermont Health Access, up to double the total amount of assistance in excess of that to which the recipient was lawfully entitled may be recovered by the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access as a preferred claim from the estate of the recipient. The Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall calculate the amount of the recovery by applying the legal interest rate to the amount of excess recovery paid, except that the recovery shall be capped at double the excess assistance paid.

When the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access finds that a recipient of benefits received assistance in excess of that to which the recipient was lawfully entitled, because the recipient possessed income or property in excess of Department standards, the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access may take actions to recover the overpayment.

In the event of recovery, an amount may be retained by the Commissioner for Children and Families or the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access in a special fund for use in offsetting program expenses and an amount equivalent to the pro rata share to which the United States of America is equitably entitled shall be paid promptly to the appropriate federal agency.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1;

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 73;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.39.

§ 123.
Guardian or legal representative.

If the Commissioner finds that an applicant for or recipient of assistance is incapable of taking care of himself or herself or his or her business affairs, the Commissioner may direct the payment of the assistance to a guardian appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

If the Commissioner finds that an applicant for or recipient of assistance is incapable of prudently attending to his or her business affairs, the Commissioner may direct the payment of the assistance to the legal representative of the person appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 124.
Inalienability of assistance payments.

All rights to and all monies or orders granted to persons as assistance shall be inalienable by assignment, transfer, attachment, trustee process, execution, or otherwise.
In case of bankruptcy, the assistance shall not pass to or through a trustee or other person acting on behalf of creditors.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 1.